Illinois, session 104th, HB4964.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Real Estate License Act of 2000 is amended 5by changing Section 15-15 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 454/15-15)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2030)8    Sec. 15-15. Duties of licensees representing clients. 9    (a) A licensee representing a client shall:10        (1) Perform the terms of the brokerage agreement 11    between a broker and the client.12        (2) Promote the best interest of the client by:13            (A) Seeking a transaction at the price and terms 14        stated in the brokerage agreement or at a price and 15        terms otherwise acceptable to the client.16            (B) Timely presenting all offers to and from the 17        client, unless the client has waived this duty.18            (C) Disclosing to the client material facts 19        concerning the transaction of which the licensee has 20        actual knowledge, unless that information is 21        confidential information. Material facts do not 22        include the following when located on or related to 23        real estate that is not the subject of the   HB4964- 2 -LRB104 18342 AAS 31782 b1        transaction: (i) physical conditions that do not have 2        a substantial adverse effect on the value of the real 3        estate, (ii) fact situations, or (iii) occurrences and 4        acts at the property.5            (D) Timely accounting for all money and property 6        received in which the client has, may have, or should 7        have had an interest.8            (E) Obeying specific directions of the client that 9        are not otherwise contrary to applicable statutes, 10        ordinances, or rules.11            (F) Acting in a manner consistent with promoting 12        the client's best interests as opposed to a licensee's 13        or any other person's self-interest.14            (G) A licensee representing a seller of 15        residential real estate shall: 16                (i) share information on the property with any 17            licensees representing prospective buyers;18                (ii) respond to inquiries from any licensees 19            representing prospective buyers;20                (iii) make the property available for showing 21            to prospective buyers; and22                (iv) within one calendar day of the start date 23            of any brokerage agreement authorizing the 24            licensee to sell the client's property, publicly 25            advertise or market the listed property for sale 26            on an Internet platform or website accessible to   HB4964- 3 -LRB104 18342 AAS 31782 b1            the public and any real estate licensees 2            representing prospective buyers unless the seller 3            completes and signs a disclosure and opt-out form 4            prescribed by the Department that includes, but is 5            not limited to: 6                    (aa) the seller's request in writing that 7                the listing firm withhold the seller's 8                property from all public marketing or 9                advertising identified by the seller; and10                    (bb) the seller's acknowledgment in 11                writing that: (I) real estate licensees 12                representing prospective buyers may not be 13                aware that the seller's property is available 14                for sale; (II) the seller's property will not 15                be displayed on Internet platforms or websites 16                that are used by the public to search for 17                property listings; (III) real estate licensees 18                and prospective buyers may not be aware of the 19                terms and conditions under which the seller is 20                offering the property for sale; and (IV) the 21                reduction in exposure of the listed property 22                may reduce the number of offers to purchase 23                the listed property and negatively impact the 24                seller's ability to sell the listed property 25                at terms favorable to the seller. 26        (3) Exercise reasonable skill and care in the   HB4964- 4 -LRB104 18342 AAS 31782 b1    performance of brokerage services.2        (4) Keep confidential all confidential information 3    received from the client.4        (5) Comply with all requirements of this Act and all 5    applicable statutes and regulations, including without 6    limitation fair housing and civil rights statutes.7    (b) A licensee representing a client does not breach a 8duty or obligation to the client by showing alternative 9properties to prospective buyers or tenants, by showing 10properties in which the client is interested to other 11prospective buyers or tenants, or by making or preparing 12contemporaneous offers or contracts to purchase or lease the 13same property. However, a licensee shall provide written 14disclosure to all clients for whom the licensee is preparing 15or making contemporaneous offers or contracts to purchase or 16lease the same property and shall refer to another designated 17agent any client that requests such referral.18    (c) A licensee representing a buyer or tenant client will 19not be presumed to have breached a duty or obligation to that 20client by working on the basis that the licensee will receive a 21higher fee or compensation based on higher selling price or 22lease cost.23    (d) A licensee shall not be liable to a client for 24providing false information to the client if the false 25information was provided to the licensee by a customer unless 26the licensee knew or should have known the information was   HB4964- 5 -LRB104 18342 AAS 31782 b1false.2    (e) Nothing in the Section shall be construed as changing 3a licensee's duty under common law as to negligent or 4fraudulent misrepresentation of material information.5(Source: P.A. 101-357, eff. 8-9-19.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.